exercise2/en_ip_adjectives_lexicon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+A	 ! Adjective tag
	+Pos	 ! Positive
	+Cmp	 ! Comparative
	+Sup	 ! Superlative

LEXICON Root
	Adjectives ; 

!
! Adjectives start here
!

LEXICON Adjectives
big	  A ;
cool	  A ;
crazy	  A ;
great	  A ;
grim	  A ;
happy	  A ;
hot	  A ;
long	  A ;
quick	  A ;
sad	  A ;
short	  A ;
slow	  A ;
small	  A ;
warm	  A ;
cute      A ;
nice      A ;
safe      A ;
wise      A ;

LEXICON A
+A:^	  Comparison ;

LEXICON Comparison
+Pos:0	  # ;
+Cmp:er	  # ;
+Sup:est  # ;

END
